North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120C. Lobbying.
Article 8. Miscellaneous.

§ 120C-800.
Reportable expenditures made by persons exempted or not covered by this Chapter.

If a designated individual accepts a reportable expenditure made for lobbying with a total value of over two hundred dollars ($200.00) per calendar quarter from a person or group of persons acting together, exempted or not otherwise covered by this Chapter, the person, or group of persons, making the reportable expenditure shall report the date, a description of the reportable expenditure, the name and address of the person, or group of persons, making the reportable expenditure, the name of the designated individual accepting the reportable expenditure, and the estimated fair market value, or face value if shown, of the reportable expenditure.

If the person making the reportable expenditure in subsection (a) of this section is outside North Carolina, and the designated individual accepting the reportable expenditure is also outside North Carolina at the time the designated individual accepts the reportable expenditure, then the designated individual accepting the reportable expenditure shall be responsible for filing the report or reporting the information in the designated individual’s statement of economic interest in accordance with G.S. 138A-24(a)(8).

If a designated individual accepts a scholarship related to that designated individual’s public service or position valued over two hundred dollars ($200.00) from a person, or group of persons, acting together, exempted or not covered by this Chapter, the person, or group of persons, granting the scholarship shall report the date of the scholarship, a description of the event involved, the name and address of the person, or group of persons, granting the scholarship, the name of the designated individual accepting the scholarship, and the estimated fair market value.

If the person granting the scholarship in subsection (c) of this section is outside North Carolina, the designated individual accepting the scholarship shall be responsible for filing the report or reporting the information in the designated individual’s statement of economic interest in accordance with G.S. 138A-24(a)(2).

This section shall not apply to any of the following:

Anything of value properly reported as required under Article 22A of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.

Any reportable expenditure from a designated individual’s extended family member to a designated individual.

Reportable expenditures associated primarily with the designated individual’s employment or that designated individual’s immediate family member’s employment.

Reportable expenditures, other than food, beverages, travel, and lodging, which are received from a person who is a citizen of a country other than the United States or a state other than North Carolina and given during a ceremonial presentation or as a custom.

A thing of value that is paid for by the State.

A scholarship paid for by a nonpartisan state, regional, national, or international legislative organization of which the General Assembly is a member or a legislator or legislative employee is a member or participant of by virtue of that legislator’s or legislative employee’s public position, or to an affiliated organization of that nonpartisan state, regional, national, or international organization.

Within 15 business days after the end of the quarter in which the reportable expenditure was made, reports required by this section shall be filed electronically with the Secretary of State in a form prescribed by the Secretary of State. If the designated individual is required to file a statement of economic interest under

G.S. 138A-24

, then that designated individual may opt to report any information required by this section in the statement of economic interest.

For purposes of this section, the term “scholarship” shall mean a grant-in-aid to attend a conference, meeting, or other similar event. For purposes of this section only, the term “person” shall include all persons as defined in G.S. 138A-3(62) and all governmental units as defined in G.S. 138A-3(36).

History.

2005-456, s. 1; 2006-201, s. 18; 2007-348, s. 17; 2008-213, ss. 37, 38(a), 39; 2009-549, s. 7(b); 2010-169, ss. 17(m), 22(f); 2010-170, s. 15; 2013-360, s. 27.1(h); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Preclearance Under § 5 of the Voting Rights Act.

The amendment by Session Laws 2010-170, s. 15, was subject to preclearance by the Department of Justice, pursuant to § 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. The section was precleared by letter dated September 23, 2010.

§§ 120C-801 through 120C-899.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 120C-999.

Table of Comparable Sections for Chapter 163A of the North Carolina General Statutes Re-recodified Into Chapter 120C

Editor’s Note.

— The following table shows G.S. sections in Chapter 120C, and their former section numbers in Chapter 163A.

Present Former Section Section Chapter 163A Chapter 120C Article 8 Article 1 Part 1 120C-100 163A-250 120C-101 163A-251 120C-102 163A-252 120C-103 163A-253 120C-104 163A-254 Article 2 Part 2 120C-200 163A-270 120C-201 163A-271 120C-202 thru -205 163A-272 thru -275 reserved reserved 120C-206 163A-276 120C-207 163A-277 120C-208, 163A-278, -209 Reserved -279 reserved 120C-210 163A-280 120C-211 163A-281 thru -214 Reserved thru -284 reserved 120C-215 163A-285 120C-216 163A-286 thru -219 reserved thru -289 reserved 120C-220 163A-290 Article 3 Part 3 120C-300 163A-305 120C-301 163A-306 120C-302 previously recodified 120C-303 163A-307 120C-304 163A-308 120C-305 163A-309 Article 4 Part 4 120C-400 163A-325 120C-401 163A-326 120C-402 163A-327 120C-403 163A-328 120C-404 163A-329 120C-405 163A-330 Article 5 Part 5 120C-500 163A-345 120C-501 163A-346 120C-502 163A-347 Article 6 Part 8 120C-600 163A-395 120C-601 163A-396 120C-602 163A-397 120C-603 163A-398 Article 7 Part 6 120C-700 163A-365 Article 8 Part 7 120C-800 163A-380

Click to view